Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-747.03
Jurisdiction to modify child support order of foreign country.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 42-748.11, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to section 42-746 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

(b) An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child support order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 85;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 46.